Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.730

Public corporations—Powers of cities, towns, and counties—Administration.

In order to improve the administration of authorized federal grants or programs, to improve governmental efficiency and services, or to improve the general living conditions in the urban areas of the state, any city, town, or county may by lawfully adopted ordinance or resolution:

(1) Transfer to any public corporation, commission, or authority created under this section, with or without consideration, any funds, real or personal property, property interests, or services;

(2) Organize and participate in joint operations or cooperative organizations funded by the federal government when acting solely as coordinators or agents of the federal government;

(3) Continue federally-assisted programs, projects, and activities after expiration of contractual term or after expending allocated federal funds as deemed appropriate to fulfill contracts made in connection with such agreements or as may be proper to permit an orderly readjustment by participating corporations, associations, or individuals;

(4) Enter into contracts with public corporations, commissions, and authorities for the purpose of exercising any powers of a community renewal agency under chapter 35.81 RCW; and

(5) Create public corporations, commissions, and authorities to: Administer and execute federal grants or programs; receive and administer private funds, goods, or services for any lawful public purpose; and perform any lawful public purpose or public function. The ordinance or resolution shall limit the liability of such public corporations, commissions, and authorities to the assets and properties of such public corporation, commission, or authority in order to prevent recourse to such cities, towns, or counties or their assets or credit.

[ 2002 c 218 s 23; 1985 c 332 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 37 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—Construction—2002 c 218: See notes following RCW 35.81.005.